New Jersey, session 222, S2947.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.  Section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3) is amended to read as follows: 3.    As used in sections 1 through 30 and 57 through 71 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.), sections 14 through 17 of P.L.2007, c.137 (C.18A:7G-45 through C.18A:7G-48), [and] sections 5, 7, 12, 15, and 19 through 21 of P.L.2023, c.311 (C.18A:7G-5b et al.), and section 3 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), unless the context clearly requires a different meaning: "Area cost allowance" means $138 per square foot for the school year 2000-2001 and shall be inflated by an appropriate cost index for the 2001-2002 school year. For the 2002-2003 school year and subsequent school years, the area cost allowance shall be established by the commissioner pursuant to subsection h. of section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4).  The area cost allowance used in determining preliminary eligible costs of school facilities projects shall be that of the year of application for approval of the project; "Capital maintenance project" means a school facilities project intended to extend the useful life of a school facility, including up-grades and replacements of building systems, such as structure, enclosure, mechanical, plumbing and electrical systems; "Commissioner" means the Commissioner of Education; "Core curriculum content standards" means the standards established pursuant to the provisions of subsection a. of section 4 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-46); "Cost index" means the average annual increase, expressed as a decimal, in actual construction cost factors for the New York City and Philadelphia areas during the second fiscal year preceding the budget year as determined pursuant to regulations promulgated by the development authority pursuant to section 26 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-26); "Debt service" means and includes payments of principal and interest upon school bonds issued to finance the acquisition of school sites and the purchase or construction of school facilities, additions to school facilities, or the reconstruction, remodeling, alteration, modernization, renovation or repair of school facilities, including furnishings, equipment, architect fees and the costs of issuance of such obligations and shall include payments of principal and interest upon school bonds heretofore issued to fund or refund such obligations, and upon municipal bonds and other obligations which the commissioner approves as having been issued for such purposes. Debt service pursuant to the provisions of P.L.1978, c.74 (C.18A:58-33.22 et seq.), P.L.1971, c.10 (C.18A:58-33.6 et seq.) and P.L.1968, c.177 (C.18A:58-33.2 et seq.) is excluded; "Demonstration project" means a school facilities project selected by the State Treasurer for construction by a redevelopment entity pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-6); "Development authority" means the New Jersey Schools Development Authority established pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-237); "District" means a local or regional school district established pursuant to chapter 8 or chapter 13 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, a county special services school district established pursuant to article 8 of chapter 46 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, a county vocational school district established pursuant to article 3 of chapter 54 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes, and a district under full State intervention pursuant to P.L.1987, c.399 (C.18A:7A-34 et al.); "District aid percentage" means the number expressed as a percentage derived from dividing the district's equalization aid calculated pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-53) as of the date of the commissioner's determination of preliminary eligible costs by the district's adequacy budget calculated pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-51) as of the date of the commissioner's determination of preliminary eligible costs; "Excess costs" means the additional costs, if any, which shall be borne by the district, of a school facilities project which result from design factors that are not required to meet the facilities efficiency standards and not approved pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection g. of section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5) or are not authorized as community design features included in final eligible costs pursuant to subsection c. of section 6 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-6); "Facilities efficiency standards" means the standards developed by the commissioner pursuant to subsection h. of section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4); "Final eligible costs" means for school facilities projects to be constructed by the development authority, the final eligible costs of the school facilities project as determined by the commissioner, in consultation with the development authority, pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5); for demonstration projects, the final eligible costs of the project as determined by the commissioner and reviewed by the development authority which may include the cost of community design features determined by the commissioner to be an integral part of the school facility and which do not exceed the facilities efficiency standards, and which were reviewed by the development authority and approved by the State Treasurer pursuant to section 6 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-6); and for districts other than SDA districts and SDA districts undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), final eligible costs as determined pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection h. of section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5); "Financing authority" means the New Jersey Economic Development Authority established pursuant to P.L.1974, c.80 (C.34:1B-1 et seq.); "FTE" means a full-time equivalent student which shall be calculated as follows: each student in grades 1 through 12 shall be counted at 100 percent of the actual count of students, in the case of districts which operate a half-day kindergarten program each kindergarten student shall be counted at 50 percent of the actual count of kindergarten students, in the case of districts which operate a full-day kindergarten program or which currently operate a half-day kindergarten program but propose to build facilities to house a full-day kindergarten program each kindergarten student shall be counted at 100 percent of the actual count of kindergarten students, and each preschool student who is enrolled in a full-day preschool program pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54) shall be counted at 100 percent of the actual count of preschool students.  In addition, each preschool disabled child who is entitled to receive a full-time program pursuant to N.J.S.18A:46-6 shall be counted at 100 percent of the actual count of these students in the district; "Functional capacity" means the number of students that can be housed in a building in order to have sufficient space for it to be educationally adequate for the delivery of programs and services necessary for student achievement of the core curriculum content standards.  Functional capacity is determined by dividing the existing gross square footage of a school building by the minimum area allowance per FTE student pursuant to subsection b. of section 8 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-8) for the grade level students contained therein.  The difference between the projected enrollment determined pursuant to subsection a. of section 8 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-8) and the functional capacity is the unhoused students that are the basis upon which the additional costs of space to provide educationally adequate facilities for the entire projected enrollment are determined.  The existing gross square footage for the purposes of defining functional capacity is exclusive of existing spaces that are not contained in the facilities efficiency standards but which are used to deliver programs and services aligned to the core curriculum content standards, used to provide support services directly to students, or other existing spaces that the district can demonstrate would be structurally or fiscally impractical to convert to other uses contained in the facilities efficiency standards; "'Kit of Parts' standardized school design elements" means the prototypical design utilizing standardized Modern Building Component Elements, Model Educational Specifications, and Model Program Templates created by the development authority for the efficient, adaptable, and scalable organization and configuration of instructional, large group assembly, and other elements within a school facilities project; "Lease purchase payment" means and includes payment of principal and interest for lease purchase agreements in excess of five years approved pursuant to subsection (f) of N.J.S.18A:20-4.2 prior to the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) to finance the purchase or construction of school facilities, additions to school facilities, or the reconstruction, remodeling, alteration, modernization, renovation or repair of school facilities, including furnishings, equipment, architect fees and issuance costs.  Approved lease purchase agreements in excess of five years shall be accorded the same accounting treatment as school bonds; "Local share" means, in the case of a school facilities project to be constructed by the development authority, the total costs less the State share as determined pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5); in the case of a demonstration project, the total costs less the State share as determined pursuant to sections 5 and 6 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5 and C.18A:7G-6); and in the case of a school facilities project which shall be financed pursuant to section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15), the total costs less the State share as determined pursuant to that section; "Local unit" means a county, municipality, board of education or any other political subdivision or instrumentality authorized to construct, operate and maintain a school facilities project and to borrow money for those purposes pursuant to law; "Local unit obligations" means bonds, notes, refunding bonds, refunding notes, lease obligations and all other obligations of a local unit which are issued or entered into for the purpose of paying for all or a portion of the costs of a school facilities project, including moneys payable to the development authority; "Long-range facilities plan" means the plan required to be submitted to the commissioner by a district pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4); "Maintenance" means expenditures which are approved for repairs and replacements for the purpose of keeping a school facility open and safe for use or in its original condition, including repairs and replacements to a school facility's heating, lighting, ventilation, security and other fixtures to keep the facility or fixtures in effective working condition. Maintenance shall not include capital maintenance or contracted custodial or janitorial services, expenditures for the cleaning of a school facility or its fixtures, the care and upkeep of grounds or parking lots, and the cleaning of, or repairs and replacements to, movable furnishings or equipment, or other expenditures which are not required to maintain the original condition over the school facility's useful life. Approved maintenance expenditures shall be as determined by the commissioner pursuant to regulations to be adopted by the commissioner pursuant to section 26 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-26); "Materials and Systems Standards" means the development authority's "Materials and Systems Standards Manual" and "Construction Details Manual," which are: intended to implement standardized designs in support of repeatable, durable, and cost-effective construction of school facilities projects; comprised of "Design Requirements" prescribing the approved standards for selection of materials, systems, and equipment to be incorporated into a school facilities project; and comprised of "Construction Details" containing standardized construction details for the construction of school facilities projects. "Model Building Component Elements" means the development of standardized prototypical model room layouts for instructional, large group, and core component building elements; "Model Educational Specifications" means the development of: room educational specifications, which describe a school's programs and activities, spatial relationships, and special environmental requirements for each space; and room fit-out lists, which provide the number, type, and size of equipment, furniture, and fixtures contained in each room inclusive of the party responsible for providing them in a school facility. "Model Program Templates" means the development of programmatic models that define the number and type of rooms and spaces to be provided in a school facility; "Model school design program" means the design standards for school facilities projects comprised of the "Kit of Parts" standardized school design elements, developed by the development authority for the adaptable and scalable configuration and repeatable and efficient construction of school facilities projects, pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection h. of section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4); "Other allowable costs" means the costs of temporary facilities, site development, acquisition of land or other real property interests necessary to effectuate the school facilities project, fees for the services of design professionals, including architects, engineers, construction managers and other design professionals, legal fees, financing costs and the administrative costs of the development authority and the financing authority or the district incurred in connection with the school facilities project; "Other facilities" means athletic stadiums, swimming pools, ice rinks, any associated structures or related equipment tied to such facilities including, but not limited to, grandstands and night field lights, greenhouses, facilities used for non-instructional or non-educational purposes, and any structure, building, or facility used solely for school administration; "Preliminary eligible costs" means the initial eligible costs of a school facilities project as calculated pursuant to the formulas set forth in section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7) or as otherwise provided pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5) and which shall be deemed to include the costs of construction and other allowable costs; "Project charter" means the document that sets forth the scope, budget, and schedule of a school facilities project, as approved by the board of the development authority, and which is updated from time to time during the course of the school facilities project with board approval. "Redevelopment entity" means a redevelopment entity authorized by a municipal governing body to implement plans and carry out redevelopment projects in the municipality pursuant to the "Local Redevelopment and Housing Law," P.L.1992, c.79 (C.40A:12A-1 et al.); "School bonds" means, in the case of a school facilities project which is to be constructed by the development authority, a redevelopment entity, or a district under section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15), bonds, notes or other obligations issued by a district to finance the local share; and, in the case of a school facilities project which is not to be constructed by the development authority or a redevelopment entity, or financed under section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15), bonds, notes or other obligations issued by a district to finance the total costs; "School enrollment" means the number of FTE students other than evening school students, including post-graduate students and post-secondary vocational students, who, on the last school day prior to October 16 of the current school year, are recorded in the registers of the school; "School facility" means and includes any structure, building, or facility used wholly or in part for educational purposes by a district and facilities that physically support such structures, buildings and facilities, such as district wastewater treatment facilities, power generating facilities, and steam generating facilities, but shall exclude other facilities; "School facilities project" means the planning, acquisition, demolition, construction, improvement, alteration, modernization, renovation, reconstruction or capital maintenance of all or any part of a school facility or of any other personal property necessary for, or ancillary to, any school facility, and shall include fixtures, furnishings and equipment, and shall also include, but is not limited to, site acquisition, site development, the services of design professionals, such as engineers and architects, construction management, legal services, financing costs and administrative costs and expenses incurred in connection with the project; "SDA district" is a district that received education opportunity aid or preschool expansion aid in the 2007-2008 school year; "Special education services pupil" means a pupil receiving specific services pursuant to chapter 46 of Title 18A of the New Jersey Statutes; "State aid" means State municipal aid and State school aid; "State debt service aid" means for school bonds issued for school facilities projects approved by the commissioner after the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) of districts which elect not to have a redevelopment entity construct the project or which elect not to finance the project under section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15), the amount of State aid determined pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9); and for school bonds or certificates of participation issued for school facilities projects approved by the commissioner prior to the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) the amount of State aid determined pursuant to section 10 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-10); "State municipal aid" means business personal property tax replacement revenues, State urban aid and State revenue sharing, as these terms are defined in section 2 of P.L.1976, c.38 (C.40A:3-3), or other similar forms of State aid payable to the local unit and to the extent permitted by federal law, federal moneys appropriated or apportioned to the municipality or county by the State; "State school aid" means the funds made available to school districts pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-53); "State share" means the State's proportionate share of the final eligible costs of a school facilities project to be constructed by the development authority as determined pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5); in the case of a demonstration project, the State's proportionate share of the final eligible costs of the project as determined pursuant to sections 5 and 6 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5 and C.18A:7G-6); and in the case of a school facilities project to be financed pursuant to section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15), the State share as determined pursuant to that section; "Total costs" means, in the case of a school facilities project which is to be constructed by the development authority or a redevelopment entity or financed pursuant to section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15), the final eligible costs plus excess costs if any; and in the case of a school facilities project which is not to be constructed by the development authority or a redevelopment entity or financed pursuant to section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15), the total cost of the project as determined by the district. (cf: P.L.2023, c.311, s.2) 2.  Section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5) is amended to read as follows: 5. a. The development authority shall undertake and the financing authority shall finance the school facilities projects of SDA districts, unless an SDA district chooses to undertake and finance a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). b.    In the case of a district other than an SDA district, State support for the project shall be determined pursuant to section 9 or section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9 or C.18A:7G-15), as applicable.  In the case of an SDA district that chooses to undertake and finance a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), State support for the project shall be determined pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9). c.     Notwithstanding any provision of N.J.S.18A:18A-16 to the contrary, the procedures for obtaining approval of a school facilities project shall be as set forth in P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.); provided that any district whose school facilities project is not constructed by the development authority shall also be required to comply with the provisions of N.J.S.18A:18A-16 and, in the case of a school facilities project that has estimated total costs over $10,000,000, shall be overseen by a non-conflicted construction management service provider, which holds a current, valid classification issued by the Division of Property Management and Construction in the Department of Treasury pursuant to its classification processes for construction managers, who shall serve from initial application to the commissioner for approval of the project through project completion. d. (1) Any district seeking to initiate a school facilities project shall apply to the commissioner for approval of the project.  The application may include, but not be limited to: a description of the school facilities project; a schematic drawing of the project or, at the option of the district, preliminary plans and specifications; a delineation and description of each of the functional components of the project; educational specifications detailing the programmatic needs of each proposed space; the number of unhoused students to be housed in the project; the area allowances per FTE student as calculated pursuant to section 8 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-8); and the estimated cost to complete the project as determined by the district. (2) (a) In the case of an SDA district school facilities project, except for an SDA district school facilities project being undertaken and financed by the SDA district pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), based upon its educational priority ranking and the Statewide strategic plan established pursuant to subsection m. of this section, the commissioner may authorize the development authority to undertake preconstruction activities which may include, but need not be limited to, site identification, investigation, and acquisition, feasibility studies, land-related design work, design work, site remediation, demolition, and acquisition of temporary facilities. Upon receipt of the authorization, the development authority may initiate the preconstruction activities required to prepare the application for commissioner approval of the school facilities project. Site remediation and demolition preconstruction activities undertaken by the development authority pursuant to this subparagraph shall be included as part of the project charter of the SDA district school facilities project, which project charter covers all other construction activities of the school facilities project. (b) In the case of an SDA district school facilities project, except for an SDA district school facilities project being undertaken and financed by the SDA district pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the project design shall conform to the standards of the model school design program developed by the development authority pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection h. of section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4). The development authority may permit an SDA district school facilities project, except for an SDA district school facilities project being undertaken and financed by the SDA district pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), to include design features that are considered excess costs provided that the design features do not exceed the lesser of 15 percent of total estimated project costs or $4,000,000. (c) In the case of a district other than an SDA district and an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the project design of a school facilities project may conform to the standards of the model school design program developed by the development authority pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection h. of section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4). e.     The commissioner shall review each proposed school facilities project to determine whether it is consistent with the district's long-range facilities plan and whether it complies with the facilities efficiency standards and the area allowances per FTE student derived from those standards; and in the case of an SDA district, except for an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the commissioner shall also review the project's educational priority ranking and the Statewide strategic plan developed pursuant to paragraphs (2) and (3) of subsection m. of this section and whether the project conforms to the standards of the model school design program; and in the case of a district other than an SDA district and an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the commissioner shall also review the project's priority pursuant to paragraph (4) of subsection m. of this section.  The commissioner shall make a decision on a district's application within 90 days from the date the commissioner determines that the application is fully and accurately completed and that all information necessary for a decision has been filed by the district, or from the date of the last revision made by the district. If the commissioner is not able to make a decision within 90 days, the commissioner shall notify the district in writing explaining the reason for the delay and indicating the date on which a decision on the project will be made, provided that the date shall not be later than 60 days from the expiration of the original 90 days set forth in this subsection.  If the decision is not made by the subsequent date indicated by the commissioner, then the project shall be deemed approved and the preliminary eligible costs for new construction shall be calculated by using the proposed square footage of the building as the approved area for unhoused students. f.     If the commissioner determines that the school facilities project complies with the facilities efficiency standards and the district's long-range facilities plan and does not exceed the area allowance per FTE student derived from those standards, the commissioner shall calculate the preliminary eligible costs of the project pursuant to the formulas set forth in section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7); except that (1) in the case of a county special services school district or a county vocational school district, the commissioner shall calculate the preliminary eligible costs to equal the amount determined by the board of school estimate and approved by the board of chosen freeholders pursuant to section 14 of P.L.1971, c.271 (C.18A:46-42) or N.J.S.18A:54-31 as appropriate, and (2) in the case of an SDA district, except for an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the commissioner shall calculate the preliminary eligible costs to equal the estimated cost as determined by the development authority. g.    If the commissioner determines that the school facilities project is inconsistent with the facilities efficiency standards or exceeds the area allowances per FTE student derived from those standards, the commissioner shall notify the district. (1)   The commissioner shall approve area allowances in excess of the area allowances per FTE student derived from the facilities efficiency standards if the board of education or State district superintendent, as appropriate, demonstrates that school facilities needs related to required programs cannot be addressed within the facilities efficiency standards and that all other proposed spaces are consistent with those standards.  The commissioner shall approve area allowances in excess of the area allowances per FTE student derived from the facilities efficiency standards if the additional area allowances are necessary to accommodate centralized facilities to be shared among two or more school buildings within the district and the centralized facilities represent a more cost effective alternative. (2)   The commissioner may waive a facilities efficiency standard if the board of education or State district superintendent, as appropriate, demonstrates to the commissioner's satisfaction that the waiver will not adversely affect the educational adequacy of the school facility, including the ability to deliver the programs and services necessary to enable all students to achieve the core curriculum content standards. (3)   To house the district's central administration, a district may request an adjustment to the approved areas for unhoused students of 2.17 square feet for each FTE student in the projected total district school enrollment if the proposed administrative offices will be housed in a school facility and the district demonstrates either that the existing central administrative offices are obsolete or that it is more practical to convert those offices to instructional space.  To the extent that existing administrative space will continue to be used for administrative purposes, the space shall be included in the formulas set forth in section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7). If the commissioner approves excess facilities efficiency standards or additional area allowances pursuant to paragraph (1), (2), or (3) of this subsection, the commissioner shall calculate the preliminary eligible costs based upon the additional area allowances or excess facilities efficiency standards pursuant to the formulas set forth in section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7).  In the event that the commissioner does not approve the excess facilities efficiency standards or additional area allowances, the district may either: modify its submission so that the school facilities project meets the facilities efficiency standards; or pay for the excess costs. (4)   The commissioner shall approve spaces in excess of, or inconsistent with, the facilities efficiency standards, hereinafter referred to as nonconforming spaces, upon a determination by the district that the spaces are necessary to comply with State or federal law concerning individuals with disabilities, including that the spaces are necessary to provide in-district programs and services for current [disabled] pupils with disabilities who are being served in out-of-district placements or in-district programs and services for the projected [disabled pupil] population of pupils with disabilities.  A district may apply for additional State aid for nonconforming spaces that will permit pupils with disabilities to be educated to the greatest extent possible in the same buildings or classes with their [nondisabled] peers without disabilities.  The nonconforming spaces may: (a) allow for the return of pupils with disabilities from private facilities; (b) permit the retention of pupils with disabilities who would otherwise be placed in private facilities; (c) provide space for regional programs in a host school building that houses both [disabled and nondisabled] pupils with and without disabilities; and (d) provide space for the coordination of regional programs by a county special services school district, educational services commission, jointure commission, or other agency authorized by law to provide regional educational services in a school building that houses both [disabled and nondisabled] pupils with and without disabilities.  A district's State support ratio shall be adjusted to equal the lesser of the sum of its district aid percentage as defined in section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3) plus 0.25, or 100 percent for any nonconforming spaces approved by the commissioner pursuant to this paragraph. h.    Upon approval of a school facilities project and determination of the preliminary eligible costs: (1)   In the case of a district other than an SDA district and an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the commissioner shall notify the district whether the school facilities project is approved and, if so approved, the preliminary eligible costs and the excess costs, if any. Following the determination of preliminary eligible costs and the notification of project approval, the district may appeal to the commissioner for an increase in those costs if the detailed plans and specifications completed by a design professional for the school facilities project indicate that the cost of constructing that portion of the project which is consistent with the facilities efficiency standards and does not exceed the area allowances per FTE student exceeds the preliminary eligible costs as determined by the commissioner for the project by 10 percent or more. The district shall file its appeal within 30 days of the preparation of the plans and specifications.  If the district chooses not to file an appeal, then the final eligible costs shall equal the preliminary eligible costs. The appeal shall outline the reasons why the preliminary eligible costs calculated for the project are inadequate and estimate the amount of the adjustment which needs to be made to the preliminary eligible costs.  The commissioner shall forward the appeal information to the development authority for its review and recommendation.  If the additional costs are the result of factors that are within the control of the district or are the result of design factors that are not required to meet the facilities efficiency standards, the development authority shall recommend to the commissioner that the preliminary eligible costs be accepted as the final eligible costs.  If the development authority determines the additional costs are not within the control of the district or are the result of design factors required to meet the facilities efficiency standards, the development authority shall recommend to the commissioner a final eligible cost based on its experience for districts with similar characteristics, provided that, notwithstanding anything to the contrary, the commissioner shall not approve an adjustment to the preliminary eligible costs which exceeds 10 percent of the preliminary eligible costs.  The commissioner shall make a determination on the appeal within 30 days of its receipt. If the commissioner does not approve an adjustment to the school facilities project's preliminary eligible costs, the commissioner shall issue his findings in writing on the reasons for the denial and on why the preliminary eligible costs as originally calculated are sufficient. (2)   In the case of an SDA district, except for an SDA school district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.     (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the commissioner shall promptly prepare and submit to the development authority a preliminary project report which shall consist, at a minimum, of the following information:  a complete description of the school facilities project; the actual location of the project; the total square footage of the project together with a breakdown of total square footage by functional component; the preliminary eligible costs of the project; the project's priority ranking determined pursuant to subsection m. of this section; any other factors to be considered by the development authority in undertaking the project; and the name and address of the person from the district to contact in regard to the project. i.     Upon receipt by the development authority of the preliminary project report, the development authority, upon consultation with the district, shall prepare detailed plans and specifications and schedules which contain the development authority's estimated cost and schedule to complete the school facilities project.  The development authority shall transmit to the commissioner its recommendations in regard to the project which shall, at a minimum, contain the detailed plans and specifications; whether the school facilities project can be completed within the preliminary eligible costs; and any other factors which the development authority determines should be considered by the commissioner. (1)   In the event that the development authority determines that the school facilities project can be completed within the preliminary eligible costs: the final eligible costs shall be deemed to equal the preliminary eligible costs; the commissioner shall be deemed to have given final approval to the project; and the preliminary project report shall be deemed to be the final project report delivered to the development authority pursuant to subsection j. of this section. (2)   In the event that the development authority determines that the school facilities project cannot be completed within the preliminary eligible costs, prior to the submission of its recommendations to the commissioner, the development authority shall, in consultation with the district and the commissioner, determine whether changes can be made in the project which will result in a reduction in costs while at the same time meeting the facilities efficiency standards approved by the commissioner. (a)   If the development authority determines that changes in the school facilities project are possible so that the project can be accomplished within the scope of the preliminary eligible costs while still meeting the facilities efficiency standards, the development authority shall so advise the commissioner, whereupon the commissioner shall: calculate the final eligible costs to equal the preliminary eligible costs; give final approval to the project with the changes noted; and issue a final project report to the development authority pursuant to subsection j. of this section. (b)   If the development authority determines that it is not possible to make changes in the school facilities project so that it can be completed within the preliminary eligible costs either because the additional costs are the result of factors outside the control of the district or the additional costs are required to meet the facilities efficiency standards, the development authority shall recommend to the commissioner that the preliminary eligible costs be increased accordingly, whereupon the commissioner shall: calculate the final eligible costs to equal the sum of the preliminary eligible costs plus the increase recommended by the development authority; give final approval to the project; and issue a final project report to the development authority pursuant to subsection j. of this section. (c)   If the additional costs are the result of factors that are within the control of the district or are the result of design factors that are not required to meet the facilities efficiency standards or approved pursuant to paragraph (1) of subsection g. of this section, the development authority shall recommend to the commissioner that the preliminary eligible costs be accepted, whereupon the commissioner shall: calculate the final eligible costs to equal the preliminary eligible costs and specify the excess costs which are to be borne by the district; give final approval to the school facilities project; and issue a final project report to the development authority pursuant to subsection j. of this section; provided that the commissioner may approve final eligible costs which are in excess of the preliminary eligible costs if, in his judgment, the action is necessary to meet the educational needs of the district. (d)   For a school facilities project undertaken by the development authority, the development authority shall be responsible for any costs of construction, but only from the proceeds of bonds issued by the financing authority pursuant to P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.), which exceed the amount originally projected by the development authority and approved for financing by the development authority, provided that the excess is the result of an underestimate of labor or materials costs by the development authority.  After receipt by the development authority of the final project report, the district shall be responsible only for the costs associated with changes, if any, made at the request of the district to the scope of the school facilities project. j.     The development authority shall not commence the construction of a school facilities project unless the commissioner transmits to the development authority a final project report and the district complies with the approval requirements for the local share, if any, pursuant to section 11 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-11).  The final project report shall contain all of the information contained in the preliminary project report and, in addition, shall contain: the final eligible costs; the excess costs, if any; the total costs which equals the final eligible costs plus excess costs, if any; the State share; and the local share. k.    For the SDA districts, the State share shall be 100 percent of the final eligible costs.  Except as otherwise provided pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9), for all other districts, including SDA districts that undertake and finance a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.     (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the State share shall be an amount equal to the district aid percentage; except that the State share shall not be less than 40 percent of the final eligible costs. If any district which is included in district factor group A or B, other than an SDA district, is having difficulty financing the local share of a school facilities project, the district may apply to the commissioner to receive 100 percent State support for the project and the commissioner may request the approval of the Legislature to increase the State share of the project to 100 percent. l.     The local share for school facilities projects constructed by the authority or a redevelopment entity shall equal the final eligible costs plus any excess costs less the State share. m. (1) Within 90 days of the effective date of P.L.2007, c.137 (C.52:18A-235 et al.), the commissioner shall develop an educational facilities needs assessment for each SDA district.  The assessment shall be updated periodically by the commissioner in accordance with the schedule the commissioner deems appropriate for the district; except that each assessment shall at a minimum be updated within five years of the development of the district's most recent prior educational facilities needs assessment.  The assessment shall be transmitted to the development authority to be used to initiate the planning activities required prior to the establishment of the educational priority ranking of school facilities projects pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection. (2)   Following the approval of an SDA district's long-range facilities plan or of an amendment to that plan, but prior to authorization of preconstruction activities for a school facilities project included in the plan or amendment, the commissioner shall establish, in consultation with the SDA district, an educational priority ranking of all school facilities projects in the SDA district based upon the commissioner's determination of critical need in accordance with priority project categories developed by the commissioner.  The priority project categories shall include, but not be limited to, health and safety, overcrowding in the early childhood, elementary, middle, and high school grade levels, spaces necessary to provide in-district programs and services for current disabled students who are being served in out-of-district placements or in-district programs and services for the projected disabled student population, rehabilitation, and educational adequacy. (3)   (a) Upon the commissioner's determination of the educational priority ranking of school facilities projects in SDA districts pursuant to paragraph (2) of this subsection, the development authority, in consultation with the commissioner, the SDA districts, and the governing bodies of the municipalities in which the SDA districts are situate, shall establish a Statewide strategic plan to be used in the sequencing of SDA district school facilities projects based upon the projects' educational priority rankings and issues which impact the development authority's ability to complete the projects including, but not limited to, the construction schedule and other appropriate factors.  The development authority shall revise the Statewide strategic plan and the sequencing of SDA district school facilities projects in accordance with that plan no less than once every five years, except that the plan shall be updated within 120 days of the effective date of P.L.2023, c.311 (C.18A:7G-5b et al.). In addition to any other information that the development authority may deem appropriate, the Statewide strategic plan shall include a description of the project, which shall indicate whether the project will be new construction or renovation and whether the project will require the acquisition of land. (b) In developing the Statewide strategic plan, the development authority shall prioritize: (i) new construction projects; (ii) projects located on land owned by the school district or other public entities; and (iii) projects needed to replace school buildings that have been in use for 100 or more years. (c) Any amendment to an SDA district's long-range facilities plan that is submitted to the commissioner in the period between the five-year updates of the long-range facilities plan shall be considered by the development authority, in consultation with the commissioner, for incorporation into the Statewide strategic plan.  In making a determination on whether or not to amend the Statewide strategic plan, the development authority shall consider the cost of the amendment, the impact of the amendment upon the school development plans for other districts, and other appropriate factors. (d)   Within 10 days following any update to the Statewide strategic plan, the development authority shall transmit the plan to the Legislature, pursuant to section 2 of P.L.1991, c.164 (C.52:14-19.1), and to the members of the Senate Education Committee and the Assembly Education Committee, or any successor committees. (4)   In the case of a district other than an SDA district and an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c. (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), the commissioner shall establish a priority process for the financing of school facilities projects based upon the commissioner's determination of critical need in accordance with priority project categories developed by the commissioner.  The priority project categories shall include, but not be limited to, health and safety, overcrowding in the elementary, middle, and high school grade levels, spaces necessary to provide in-district programs and services for current disabled students who are being served in out-of-district placements or in-district programs and services for the projected disabled student population, and full-day kindergarten facilities in the case of school districts required to provide full-day preschool pursuant to section 12 of P.L.2007, c.260 (C.18A:7F-54). n.    The provisions of the "Public School Contracts Law," N.J.S.18A:18A-1 et seq., shall be applicable to any school facilities project constructed by a district but shall not be applicable to projects constructed by the development authority or a redevelopment entity pursuant to the provisions of this act. o.    In the case of a school facilities project of a district other than an SDA district and an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.   , c.   (C.     ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), any proceeds of school bonds issued by the district for the purpose of funding the project which remain unspent upon completion of the project shall be used by the district to reduce the outstanding principal amount of the school bonds. p.    Upon completion by the development authority of a school facilities project, if the cost of construction and completion of the project is less than the total costs, the district shall be entitled to receive a portion of the local share based on a pro rata share of the difference based on the ratio of the State share to the local share. q.    The development authority shall determine the cause of any costs of construction which exceed the amount originally projected by the development authority and approved for financing by the financing authority. r.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.137). s.     (Deleted by amendment, P.L.2007, c.137). (cf: P.L.2023, c.311, s.4) 3.  (New section)  a.  An SDA district may undertake and finance a school facilities project and receive State debt service aid for the project, subject to the provisions of this section.  An SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to this section shall apply to the commissioner for approval of the project, as well as for the determination of preliminary eligible costs, final eligible costs, and excess costs, if any, in accordance with the applicable provisions of section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5).  A school facilities project to be undertaken and financed by an SDA district pursuant to this section shall be consistent with the districts long-range facilities plan developed pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4); provided, however, that the project is not included in the most recent educational priority ranking of school facilities projects pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection m. of section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5) and is not a project that has been identified for advancement in the most recent version of the Statewide strategic plan developed pursuant to paragraph (3) of subsection m. of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5). b.  An SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to this section shall be constructed and managed by the SDA district in accordance with the provisions of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and any other applicable provision of law.  Nothing in this section shall be construed as requiring the financing authority to be responsible for the issuance of the SDA districts school bonds or requiring the development authority to be responsible for the planning, design, construction management, acquisition, construction, and completion of the project.  An SDA district undertaking a school facilities project pursuant to this section, which project is a capital maintenance project, shall not be required to receive authorization from the development authority to undertake the design, acquisition, construction, and all other appropriate actions necessary to complete the project, and shall not be subject to the requirements concerning the development authoritys delegation of management of the project enumerated in section 13 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-13).  The school facilities project may, but is not required to, conform to the model school design program developed by the development authority pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection h. of section 4 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-4). c.  An SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to this section may issue school bonds to finance the total costs of the project in accordance with the provisions for the approval of capital projects pursuant to N.J.S.18A:22-1 et seq., N.J.S.18A:24-1 et seq., and P.L.1991, c.139 (C.18A:7A-46.1 et seq.), as applicable to the district.  The district shall be eligible to receive State debt service aid for school bonds issued pursuant to this subsection in accordance with the formula established pursuant to section 9 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9), provided that the school facilities project for which school bonds are to be issued is approved by the commissioner after the effective date of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill). 4.  Section 9 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-9) is amended to read as follows: 9. a. State debt service aid for capital investment in school facilities for a district other than an SDA district which elects not to finance the project under section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15) and for an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.     (C. ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), shall be distributed upon a determination of preliminary eligible costs by the commissioner, according to the following formula: Aid is the sum of A for each issuance of school bonds issued for a school facilities project of a district other than an SDA district, which project is approved by the commissioner after the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.), and for each issuance of school bonds issued for a school facilities project of an SDA district undertaking and financing a school facilities project pursuant to section 3 of P.L.    , c.     (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill), which project is approved by the commissioner after the effective date of P.L.    , c.    (C.        ) (pending before the Legislature as this bill) where A = B x AC/P x   DAP x M, with AC/P =1 whenever AC/P would otherwise yield a number greater than one, and where: B is the district's debt service for the individual issuance for the fiscal year; AC is the preliminary eligible costs determined pursuant to section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7); P is the principal of the individual issuance plus any other funding sources approved for the school facilities project; DAP is the district's district aid percentage as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3) and where DAP shall not be less than 40 percent. If the project's design incorporates the implementation of energy efficiency improvements or the installation of energy efficient features or equipment, the DAP shall be increased by no more than five percent.  In order to qualify for a DAP increase for the implementation of energy efficiency improvements or the installation of energy efficient features or equipment pursuant to this subsection, a district shall submit to the development authority and Department of Education a certification, along with evidential documentation, attesting that the project's design incorporates the implementation of energy efficiency improvements or the installation of energy efficient features or equipment; and M is a factor representing the degree to which a district has fulfilled maintenance requirements for a school facilities project determined pursuant to subsection b. of this section. For county special services school districts, DAP shall be that of the county vocational school district in the same county. Notwithstanding the provisions of this subsection to the contrary, DAP for a county vocational school district school facilities project that is approved by the commissioner following the effective date of P.L.2009, c.185 shall equal the greater of the district's district aid percentage as defined pursuant to section 3 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-3) or the percentage of the students in the county vocational school district's resident enrollment who reside in SDA districts; except that DAP shall not be less than 40 percent or greater than 90 percent. b.    The maintenance factor (M) shall be 1.0 except when one of the following conditions applies, in which case the maintenance factor shall be as specified: (1)   Effective ten years from the date of the enactment of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.), the maintenance factor for aid for reconstruction, remodeling, alteration, modernization, renovation or repair, or for an addition to a school facility, shall be zero for all school facilities projects for which the district fails to demonstrate over the ten years preceding issuance a net investment in maintenance of the related school facility of at least two percent of the replacement cost of the school facility, determined pursuant to subsection b. of section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7) using the area cost allowance of the year ten years preceding the year in which the school bonds are issued. (2)   For new construction, additions, and school facilities aided under subsection b. of section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7) supported by financing issued for projects approved by the commissioner after the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.), beginning in the fourth year after occupancy of the school facility, the maintenance factor shall be reduced according to the following schedule for all school facilities projects for which the district fails to demonstrate in the prior fiscal year an investment in maintenance of the related school facility of at least two-tenths of one percent of the replacement cost of the school facility, determined pursuant to subsection b. of section 7 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-7). Maintenance Percentage               Maintenance Factor (M) .199% - .151%                               75% .150% - .100%                               50% Less than .100%                            Zero (3)   Within one year of the enactment of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.), the commissioner shall promulgate rules requiring districts to develop a long-range maintenance plan and specifying the expenditures that qualify as an appropriate investment in maintenance for the purposes of this subsection. c.     Any district which obtained approval from the commissioner since September 1, 1998 and prior to the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) of the educational specifications for a school facilities project or obtained approval from the Department of Community Affairs or the appropriately licensed municipal code official since September 1, 1998 of the final construction plans and specifications, and the district has issued debt, may elect to have the final eligible costs of the project determined pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5) and to receive debt service aid under this section or under section 10 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-10). Any district which received approval from the commissioner for a school facilities project at any time prior to the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.), and has not issued debt, other than short term notes, may submit an application pursuant to section 5 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-5) to have the final eligible costs of the project determined pursuant to that section and to have the New Jersey Economic Development Authority construct the project; or, at its discretion, the district may choose to receive debt service aid under this section or under section 10 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-10) or to receive a grant under section 15 of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-15). For the purposes of this subsection, the "issuance of debt" shall include lease purchase agreements in excess of five years. d.    For school bonds issued for a school facilities project after the effective date of P.L.2000, c.72 (C.18A:7G-1 et al.) and prior to the effective date of P.L.2008, c.39 (C.18A:7G-14.1 et al.), State debt service aid shall be calculated in accordance with the provisions of this section as the same read before the effective date of P.L.2008, c.39 (C.18A:7G-14.1 et al.). (cf: P.L.2023, c.311, s.6) 5. This act shall take effect immediately.